Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3509
Surgical assisting, defined.

Surgical assisting means the practice of promoting patient safety through provision of primary assistance to the primary surgeon during a surgical procedure.

Laws 2016, LB721, § 9.